Wyoming, session 2026, HB0054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-5-301(a), 22-5-304 and 22-5-307
are amended to read:

22-5-301. Independent partisan candidates; form.

HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046
(a) Independent candidates for partisan public
offices may be nominated by filing a signed petition in
substantially the following form:

PETITION FOR NOMINATION

I, ...., swear or affirm that I was born on ....,
....(year), that I have been a resident of the State of
Wyoming since ...., and that I am a registered voter of
Election District No. ...., in Precinct No. ...., County of
...., residing at ...., (if for the office of state senator
or representative, commissioner or other district office)
in Senate (House) (Commissioner or other) District ....,
State of Wyoming, (if for the office of governor), that I
am an unaffiliated voter or am otherwise not registered in
a major or minor political party and that I resided at the
physical residential addresses listed below during the past
five (5) years, and having obtained the number of
signatures required by law for nomination by petition, I
hereby request that my name be printed on the official
ballot at the next general election as an independent
candidate for the office of .... and declare that if
nominated and elected, I will qualify for the office.
HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046

(If for the office of United States senator or
representative in congress) I have not, at any time when
knowingly seeking nomination or election to this office,
claimed or been currently claiming any residence or
received the benefits of residency from any other state,
excluding the benefits of residency related to or
incidental from maintaining a residence at or near the
United States capital.

(If for the office of governor) I have resided at the
following physical residential addresses during the past
five (5) years:

(Residence) (Date)

1. ................... ...................

2. ................... ...................

Dated the .... day of ...., ....(year).

....................... (Signature)
HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046

The eligible, registered electors supporting my nomination,
and numbering not less than the number required under W.S.
22-5-304, are as follows:

(Signature) (Printed Name) (Residence) (Date)

1. ...................

2. ...................

VERIFICATION BY CIRCULATORS

I, ...., do hereby certify that I am a circulator of this
petition, and I solely and personally circulated this
petition, that all the signatures appearing herein were
made in my presence from .... (month) .... (day),
....(year) through .... (month) .... (day), ....(year), and
to the best of my knowledge and belief such signatures are
those of the persons whose names they purport to be.

............... (Signature)

HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046
22-5-304. Qualifications and number of signers
required.

(a) For a statewide partisan office, a petition shall
be signed by registered electors, resident in the state and
eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering not less
than two percent (2%) five percent (5%) of the total number
of votes cast for representative in congress in the last
general election for the entire state.

(b) For a countywide partisan office, a petition
shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the
county and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering
not less than two percent (2%) five percent (5%) of the
total number of votes cast for representative in congress
in the last general election for the entire county.

(c) For a district partisan election, a petition
shall be signed by registered electors, resident in the
district and eligible to vote for the petitioner, numbering
not less than two percent (2%) five percent (5%) of the
total number of votes cast for the office in that
particular district in the last general election. If a
HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046
district's boundaries have changed since the last general
election, then the required number of petition signatures
shall not be less than two percent (2%) five percent (5%)
of the number of registered voters in the current district
boundaries at the close of day on the day immediately
preceding the primary votes cast for the particular office
in the last general election.

22-5-307. Time for filing independent petitions.

Petitions filed An independent candidate for partisan
public office shall obtain approval to circulate the
petition as required by W.S. 22-5-301(b) with the secretary
of state and with or the county clerk shall be filed not
less than seventy (70) eighty-one (81) days before a the
date of the primary election in the applicable general
election year. The candidate shall have not more than
fourteen (14) additional days after obtaining approval of
the candidate's petition to file the petition with the
appropriate filing office.

HB0054

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0046
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0054